New York, session 2025-2026, A5889.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "worker 2 health care protection act". 3 § 2. The public health law is amended by adding a new section 268-i to 4 read as follows: 5 § 268-i. Worker health care protection act. 1. On or before January 6 first, two thousand twenty-seven, the marketplace shall establish a 7 worker health plan access program to assist New Yorkers who lose health 8 care coverage provided by an employer or a joint labor management trust 9 as a result of an active strike, lockout, or other labor dispute. 10 2. Subject to the availability of funding, the marketplace shall 11 provide enrollment assistance to help maintain coverage for individuals 12 and their dependents who: 13 (a) provide a self-attestation regarding loss of minimum essential 14 health care coverage from an employer or joint labor management trust 15 fund as a result of an active strike, lockout, or other labor dispute; 16 and 17 (b) are eligible for coverage offered through the marketplace. 18 3. The marketplace may request from an applicable employer, labor 19 organization, or other appropriate representative information to deter- 20 mine the status of a strike, lockout, or labor dispute, its impact to 21 coverage, and any other information determined by the marketplace as 22 necessary to conduct outreach and determine eligibility for federal and 23 state subsidies offered through the marketplace. An applicable employer, 24 labor organization, or other appropriate representative shall provide to EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07333-01-5 A. 5889 2 1 the marketplace any such information requested by the marketplace pursu- 2 ant to this subdivision. 3 4. The marketplace shall establish a process for providing outreach 4 and enrollment assistance, and may establish additional procedural 5 requirements to administer the program established pursuant to subdivi- 6 sion one of this section. 7 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately.